Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-239 Intervening breach. If any
breach of warranty or condition in any insurance contract occurs prior to a
loss under the contract, the breach shall not avoid the contract nor avail the
insurer to avoid liability, unless the breach exists at the time of loss. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next